Utah statutes.
75-1-301.   Territorial application.
Except as otherwise provided in this code, this code applies to:
(1)  The affairs and estates of decedents, missing persons, and persons to be
protected, domiciled in this state;
(2)  The property of nonresidents located in this state or property coming
into the control of a fiduciary who is subject to the laws of this state;
(3)  Incapacitated persons and minors in this state;
(4)  Survivorship and related accounts in this state; and
(5)  Trusts subject to administration in this state.
